Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB373.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 121.175 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No candidate, committee, or contributing organization shall permit funds in a
campaign account to be expended for any purpose other than for allowable
campaign expenditures. "Allowable campaign expenditures" means expenditures
including reimbursement for actual expenses, made directly and primarily in
support of or opposition to a candidate, constitutional amendment, or public
question which will appear on the ballot and includes, but is not limited to,
expenditures for staff salaries, gifts and meals for volunteer campaign workers,
food and beverages provided at a campaign rally, advertising, office space,
necessary travel if reported, campaign paraphernalia, purchases of advertisements
in athletic and scholastic publications, communications with constituents or
prospective voters, polling and consulting, printing, graphic arts, or advertising
services, postage, office supplies, stationery, newsletters, and equipment which is
used primarily for the administration of the campaign, or for fees incurred from
legal services while defending a matter before the Kentucky Legislative Ethics
Commission in which the final adjudication is rendered in favor of the candidate.
"Allowable campaign expenditures" does not include necessary travel unless
reported, expenditures of funds in a campaign account for any purpose made
unlawful by other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes or which would
bestow a private pecuniary benefit, except for payment of the reasonable value of
goods and services provided upon a candidate, member of the candidate's family,
committee, or contributing organization, or any of their employees, paid or unpaid,
including: tickets to an event which is unrelated to a political campaign or
candidacy; items of personal property for distribution to prospective voters except
items bearing the name, likeness, or logo of a candidate or a campaign-related
Page 1 of 4
BR154400.100 - 1544 - XXXX 2/26/2025 6:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1544
communication; expenditures to promote or oppose a candidacy for a leadership
position in a governmental, professional, or political organization, or other entity;
and equipment or appliances the primary use of which is for purposes outside of the
campaign. The provisions of KRS 121.190 notwithstanding, a candidate shall not be
required to include a disclaimer on campaign stationery purchased with funds from
his campaign account.
(2) A member of the General Assembly may utilize funds in his or her campaign
account to:
(a) Contribute up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per year to a political party or
caucus campaign committee;
(b) Make allowable campaign expenditures in both election years and nonelection
years;
(c) Upon approval by the President of the Senate or the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, depending on the member's chamber:
1. Attend a conference, meeting, reception, or similar event; or
2. Attend an educational course or seminar that maintains or improves
skills employed by the member in carrying out the duties of his or her
elective office; and
(d) Pay for fees incurred from legal services while defending a matter arising
from his or her campaign or election or the performance of his or her official
duties.
(3) (a) The use of campaign funds to pay for the reasonable costs of security
measures for a state candidate, officeholder, member of his or her family,
and employees of the candidate's campaign or the officeholder's office, is
an allowable campaign expenditure, so long as the security measures
address ongoing dangers or threats that would not exist irrespective of the
individual's status or duties as a candidate or officeholder. Disbursements
Page 2 of 4
BR154400.100 - 1544 - XXXX 2/26/2025 6:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1544
for security measures shall be for the usual and normal charge for such
goods or services.
(b) As used in this subsection:
1. "Security measure " includes but is not limited to:
a. Non-structural security devices, such as security hardware,
locks, alarm systems, motion detectors, and security camera
systems;
b. Structural security devices, such as wiring, lighting, gates, doors,
and fencing, so long as such devices are intended solely to
provide security and not to improve the property or increase its
value;
c. Security personnel and services that are bona fide, legitimate,
and professional; and
d. Cybersecurity software, devices, and services; and
2. "Usual and normal charge" means:
a. In the case of goods, the price of those goods in the market in
which they are ordinarily purchased; and
b. In the case of services, the hourly or piecework charge for the
services at a commercially reasonable rate prevailing at the time
the services were rendered.
(4)[(3)] By December 31, 1993, the registry shall promulgate administrative
regulations to implement and enforce the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section.
(5)[(4)] In lieu of the penalties provided in KRS 121.140 and 121.990 for a violation
of this section, the registry may, after hearing:
(a) For a violation which was not committed knowingly, order the violator to
repay the amount of campaign funds which were expended for other than
Page 3 of 4
BR154400.100 - 1544 - XXXX 2/26/2025 6:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1544
allowable campaign expenditures, and if not repaid within thirty (30) days,
may impose a fine of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for each day the
amount is not repaid, up to a maximum fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000);
and
(b) For a violation which was committed knowingly, in addition to referring the
matter for criminal prosecution, order the violator to repay the amount of
campaign funds which were expended for other than allowable campaign
expenditures, and if not repaid within thirty (30) days, may impose a fine of
up to one hundred dollars ($100) for each day the amount is not repaid, up to
a maximum fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).
Page 4 of 4
BR154400.100 - 1544 - XXXX 2/26/2025 6:01 PM Jacketed